prince/dictionaries/he-IL.dic
אביביות/A
אגד/A
אגרונומיות/A
אדמוניות/A
אובייקטיביות/A
אווילה/A
אוטומט/A
אולימפיים/A
אונקולוגי/A
אופטימיזם/A
אוקיינוסים/A
אוריינטציה/A
אזוב/A
אחורי/A
אטיים/A
אידאל/A
איטלקים/A
אימונולוג/A
אינדיאנים/A
אינטלקטואל/A
אינסטרומנטליות/A
אירוניה/A
אכוף/A
אלגוריות/A
אלי/A
אלכימית/A
אלקטרומגנטיים/A
אמוציונליות/A
אמפירי/A
אנאלפביתיות/A
אנושה/A
אניץ/A
אנרגטית/A
אסטרואידים/A
אסם/A
אפוא/A
אפילוג/A
אפסיות/A
אצ"ל/A
אקדוחנים/A
אקזיסטנציאליזם/A
אקסיומתית/A
ארגומנטציות/A
ארומתית/A
ארכאולוגי/A
ארמנית/A
אשכנזי/A
אתגריות/A
אתרים/A
בדד/A
בהולה/A
בודים/A
בוטנית/A
בולעים/A
בוצרות/A
בזבוזים/A
בטון/A
ביוב/A
ביזיונות/A
ביניהם/A
בירוא/A
בלדות/A
בליסטיים/A
במאים/A
בע"ח/A
בצירים/A
ברדס/A
בריוניות/A
בשלנית/A
גאוגרפי/A
גבול/A
גג/A
גואל/A
גוזמה/A
גונזות/A
גורים/A
גזורות/A
גחמנית/A
גיזרונים/A
גיפוף/A
גלובליים/A
גלקסיות/A
גנבת/A
גסה/A
גרוטסקיים/A
גרמניום/A
גשש/A
דברנית/A
דהרה/A
דוגמנות/A
דוכנים/A
דופמין/A
דחוסה/A
דיבה/A
דיחוי/A
דינמיים/A
דיקטטורות/A
דליקה/A
דמעה/A
דציליטר/A
דרבוקה/A
דרכים/A
האהלות/A
הביתה/A
הגדרות/A
הגרה/A
הדלקות/A
הודפות/A
הומופוביה/A
הוראות/A
הזדעזעות/A
הזרקות/A
החשדה/A
היאטמויות/A
היהפכויות/A
היכרות/A
היסחפויות/A
היפקדויות/A
הישלפות/A
הלא/A
המלצה/A
הסגרה/A
הסתעפויות/A
הפלה/A
הצטמקויות/A
הצתה/A
הקראות/A
הרעפה/A
השמנות/A
השתמעות/A
התאפסות/A
התגלמות/A
התחסלויות/A
התכנסויות/A
התמרמרויות/A
התעדנויות/A
התפלגויות/A
התקפלויות/A
וודקה/A
וריאציה/A
זוגית/A
זיבה/A
זלעפות/A
זקנקנים/A
חבית/A
חובבנים/A
חולדות/A
חוסם/A
חורשים/A
חטוטרת/A
חייתיות/A
חיתונים/A
חלמון/A
חמצני/A
חסידיים/A
חצים/A
חריפה/A
חשיבתית/A
טבלה/A
טוניקה/A
טיגון/A
טלגרמות/A
טעינה/A
טרוריסט/A
טרשיים/A
יובשנית/A
יזומים/A
ייעוץ/A
יענים/A
ירוקת/A
יתמות/A
כובסת/A
כופל/A
כיול/A
כלבלבים/A
כמותכן/A
כפילה/A
כרסומים/A
לבדה/A
לואטת/A
לולניות/A
לטיני/A
ליש"ט/A
לפתע/A
מאדים/A
מאוכזב/A
מאותת/A
מאמין/A
מאששים/A
מבוילת/A
מבחילים/A
מבסמים/A
מבתרים/A
מגוונות/A
מגיחות/A
מגע/A
מדגישה/A
מדורבנת/A
מדנג/A
מהדרות/A
מהנדס/A
מובאים/A
מוגבלים/A
מודח/A
מוזיאונים/A
מוחלטים/A
מוטלים/A
מוכרחת/A
מומחזים/A
מונופוליסט/A
מוסטת/A
מועך/A
מופלות/A
מוצב/A
מוקזות/A
מוראות/A
מורקדות/A
מושכבים/A
מושתקת/A
מזדכה/A
מזוכיסטיות/A
מזללה/A
מזרקים/A
מחוילות/A
מחושקות/A
מחלבות/A
מחסמות/A
מחשה/A
מטויבות/A
מטלפנים/A
מטריצות/A
מיוחצנות/A
מיטשטשות/A
מיירטת/A
מינים/A
מישירה/A
מכונה/A
מכיר/A
מכרז/A
מלבנות/A
מלות/A
מלעיגה/A
ממוזערים/A
ממוקשות/A
ממכרת/A
ממציאה/A
מנבאת/A
מנוונים/A
מנוקזות/A
מניקות/A
מנקזות/A
מסדרון/A
מסונדלים/A
מסיט/A
מסמיכות/A
מסר/A
מסתכמת/A
מעגלי/A
מעונגות/A
מעיינות/A
מענישים/A
מערכתיות/A
מפוטמים/A
מפורקים/A
מפיצות/A
מפספסים/A
מפרים/A
מצבים/A
מצונף/A
מצטמגות/A
מצלות/A
מצפן/A
מקודדות/A
מקורבת/A
מקלחונים/A
מקפים/A
מקרקר/A
מרדף/A
מרופפים/A
מרינות/A
מרפד/A
מש"קיות/A
משובב/A
משוך/A
משופים/A
משחימים/A
משכיבים/A
משמין/A
משפד/A
משרבב/A
משתחזרות/A
משתמרת/A
מתאבן/A
מתאפק/A
מתבלבלות/A
מתגלות/A
מתואגדת/A
מתוכנתת/A
מתזמר/A
מתחנף/A
מתייהדים/A
מתכבדות/A
מתלהטות/A
מתמיד/A
מתמשכת/A
מתנמנמת/A
מתעוורים/A
מתעקמים/A
מתפכח/A
מתפשטת/A
מתקעקעת/A
מתרוממים/A
מתרתחת/A
נאצלות/A
נבלם/A
נגיחות/A
נדונים/A
נהנה/A
נוהג/A
נוסח/A
נוראית/A
נזלתי/A
נחלב/A
נחשונים/A
ניאות/A
ניטעות/A
ניצלת/A
נכחד/A
נלמד/A
נמסך/A
ננצר/A
נספחים/A
נעצם/A
נפלאות/A
נצח/A
נקודתיים/A
נקשרים/A
נרקיסיזם/A
נשית/A
נתון/A
סבירה/A
סדרתיים/A
סוחפים/A
סופג/A
סחוסי/A
סטנסיל/A
סייג/A
סינגל/A
סירה/A
סליליים/A
סנ"צ/A
ספוגית/A
ספרטיסטיים/A
סרוקה/A
עברייה/A
עובי/A
עונד/A
עזה/A
עימומים/A
עלובים/A
עמעום/A
עצביים/A
עקרוני/A
ערסל/A
פברוקים/A
פודיומים/A
פוליתאיסטיים/A
פועל/A
פורענות/A
פטורים/A
פיזיולוגיות/A
פינתי/A
פלאיות/A
פלש/A
פסגות/A
פסלים/A
פקוחים/A
פרוביזורי/A
פרופילקטיות/A
פרינציפ/A
פרעונית/A
פתוח/A
צבורים/A
צוואה/A
צורני/A
צינור/A
צם/A
צעירות/A
צריחים/A
קדוחה/A
קודחות/A
קולופונים/A
קומצים/A
קונפיגורציות/A
קוצצות/A
קטיף/A
קייטנית/A
קיתונות/A
קלסיקה/A
קנאים/A
קפיטליסטיות/A
קרדיולוגיות/A
קרינות/A
קשקוש/A
רביזיה/A
רדודים/A
רודנית/A
רומס/A
רחובות/A
ריחוף/A
רכוסה/A
רס"נית/A
רפויות/A
רצסיביות/A
רתוחות/A
שבלול/A
שואב/A
שוטטויות/A
שוער/A
שזורה/A
שטנים/A
שייכים/A
שישות/A
שלהם/A
שמאלים/A
שנוי/A
שפחות/A
שקרנות/A
ששונות/A
תאורן/A
תדר/A
תועים/A
תזונאי/A
תחקור/A
תיעוב/A
תלונות/A
תמרורים/A
תערים/A
תצרוכות/A
תרביות/A
תשחורת/A
